Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-9502
Legislative intent; purpose of act.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to promote personal responsibility for health care and cost-effective delivery of health care by enabling the innovative use of direct primary care practice agreements for primary medical care in order to improve access to medical care, reduce the use of emergency departments for primary care, and allow emergency departments to treat emergencies more effectively and reduce costs.

(2) The purpose of the Direct Primary Care Agreement Act is to confirm that direct primary care agreements that meet the requirements of the act do not constitute insurance or function as a qualified health plan pursuant to any federal mandates.

Laws 2016, LB817, § 2.
July 21, 2016